New York, session 2025-2026, S410.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of rule 4404 of the civil practice law and 2 rules, such rule as renumbered by chapter 315 of the laws of 1962, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 (a) Motion after trial where jury required. After a trial of a cause 5 of action or issue triable of right by a jury, upon the motion of any 6 party or on its own initiative, the court may set aside a verdict or any 7 judgment entered thereon and direct that judgment be entered in favor of 8 a party entitled to judgment as a matter of law or it may order a new 9 trial of a cause of action or separable issue where the verdict is 10 contrary to the weight of the evidence, in the interest of justice or 11 where the jury cannot agree after being kept together for as long as is 12 deemed reasonable by the court. No court shall order a new trial on the 13 ground that the jury award was excessive, or otherwise act to reduce the 14 jury's award in a case involving an unlawful discriminatory practice 15 under section two hundred ninety-six of the executive law relating to 16 employment, including a claim by a non-employee under section two 17 hundred ninety-six-d of the executive law, or under any analogous local 18 or municipal human rights law, if applicable, without fully satisfying 19 the pertinent standards set forth in paragraph two of subdivision (c) of 20 section fifty-five hundred one of this chapter and paragraph (b) of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00984-01-5 S. 410 2 1 subdivision nine of section two hundred ninety-seven of the executive 2 law. 3 § 2. Subdivision (c) of section 5501 of the civil practice law and 4 rules, as amended by chapter 474 of the laws of 1997, is amended to read 5 as follows: 6 (c) Appellate division. 1. The appellate division shall review ques- 7 tions of law and questions of fact on an appeal from a judgment or order 8 of a court of original instance and on an appeal from an order of the 9 supreme court, a county court or an appellate term determining an 10 appeal. The notice of appeal from an order directing summary judgment, 11 or directing judgment on a motion addressed to the pleadings, shall be 12 deemed to specify a judgment upon said order entered after service of 13 the notice of appeal and before entry of the order of the appellate 14 court upon such appeal, without however affecting the taxation of costs 15 upon the appeal. In reviewing a money judgment in an action in which an 16 itemized verdict is required by rule forty-one hundred eleven of this 17 chapter in which it is contended that the award is excessive or inade- 18 quate and that a new trial should have been granted unless a stipulation 19 is entered to a different award, the appellate division shall determine 20 that an award is excessive or inadequate if it deviates materially from 21 what would be reasonable compensation. 22 2. Where an award is made by a jury for any damages in a case involv- 23 ing an unlawful discriminatory practice under section two hundred nine- 24 ty-six of the executive law relating to employment, or under any analo- 25 gous local or municipal human rights law, including a claim by a 26 non-employee under section two hundred ninety-six-d of the executive 27 law, the jury's verdict is presumed to be correct. Any such jury award 28 shall not be disturbed unless the court finds, reviewing the evidence in 29 the light most favorable to sustaining the verdict, exceptional circum- 30 stances which compel the conclusion that (i) the jury was influenced by 31 partiality, prejudice, mistake or corruption, and (ii) remittitur or 32 additur is necessary to avoid a complete miscarriage of justice. In 33 making such determination, the court shall give primary weight to the 34 remedial purpose of the law, and shall not limit any award by using any 35 characterizations of other damage awards. In any such case, the court 36 shall not be bound by any precedent which utilized the concept of mate- 37 rial deviation from what would be reasonable compensation, or a judge's 38 personal knowledge or experiences from prior cases. 39 § 3. Subdivision 9 of section 297 of the executive law, as amended by 40 chapter 140 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 41 9. (a) Any person claiming to be aggrieved by an unlawful discrimina- 42 tory practice shall have a cause of action in any court of appropriate 43 jurisdiction for damages, including, in cases of employment discrimi- 44 nation related to private employers and housing discrimination only, 45 punitive damages, and such other remedies as may be appropriate, includ- 46 ing any civil fines and penalties provided in subdivision four of this 47 section, unless such person had filed a complaint hereunder or with any 48 local commission on human rights, or with the superintendent pursuant to 49 the provisions of section two hundred ninety-six-a of this article, 50 provided that, where the division has dismissed such complaint on the 51 grounds of administrative convenience, on the grounds of untimeliness, 52 or on the grounds that the election of remedies is annulled, such person 53 shall maintain all rights to bring suit as if no complaint had been 54 filed with the division. At any time prior to a hearing before a hearing 55 examiner, a person who has a complaint pending at the division may 56 request that the division dismiss the complaint and annul his or her S. 410 3 1 election of remedies so that the human rights law claim may be pursued 2 in court, and the division may, upon such request, dismiss the complaint 3 on the grounds that such person's election of an administrative remedy 4 is annulled. Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of section two hundred four 5 of the civil practice law and rules, if a complaint is so annulled by 6 the division, upon the request of the party bringing such complaint 7 before the division, such party's rights to bring such cause of action 8 before a court of appropriate jurisdiction shall be limited by the stat- 9 ute of limitations in effect in such court at the time the complaint was 10 initially filed with the division. Any party to a housing discrimination 11 complaint shall have the right within twenty days following a determi- 12 nation of probable cause pursuant to subdivision two of this section to 13 elect to have an action commenced in a civil court, and an attorney 14 representing the division of human rights will be appointed to present 15 the complaint in court, or, with the consent of the division, the case 16 may be presented by complainant's attorney. A complaint filed by the 17 equal employment opportunity commission to comply with the requirements 18 of 42 USC 2000e-5(c) and 42 USC 12117(a) and 29 USC 633(b) shall not 19 constitute the filing of a complaint within the meaning of this subdivi- 20 sion. No person who has initiated any action in a court of competent 21 jurisdiction or who has an action pending before any administrative 22 agency under any other law of the state based upon an act which would be 23 an unlawful discriminatory practice under this article, may file a 24 complaint with respect to the same grievance under this section or under 25 section two hundred ninety-six-a of this article. In cases of housing 26 discrimination only, a person whose complaint has been dismissed by the 27 division after investigation for lack of jurisdiction or lack of proba- 28 ble cause may file the same cause of action in a court of appropriate 29 jurisdiction pursuant to this section, unless judicial review of such 30 dismissal has been sought pursuant to section two hundred ninety-eight 31 of this article. The attorney general shall have the power to commence 32 an action or proceeding in the supreme court of the state of New York, 33 if, upon information or belief, the attorney general is of the opinion 34 that an employer has been, is, or is about to violate the provisions 35 regarding unlawful discriminatory retaliation pursuant to subdivision 36 seven of section two hundred ninety-six of this article. Nothing in this 37 section shall in any way limit rights or remedies which are otherwise 38 available under law to the attorney general or any other person author- 39 ized to bring an action under this section. 40 (b) A verdict involving an unlawful discriminatory practice under 41 section two hundred ninety-six of this article relating to employment, 42 including a claim by a non-employee under section two hundred ninety- 43 six-d of this article, or under any analogous local or human rights law, 44 if applicable, shall not be subject to remittitur or additur, or grant- 45 ing of a motion for new trial on the ground that the verdict was exces- 46 sive or inadequate, or otherwise reduced or increased, unless the court 47 finds, reviewing the evidence in the light most favorable to sustaining 48 the verdict, exceptional circumstances which compel the conclusion that 49 (i) the jury was influenced by partiality, prejudice, mistake or 50 corruption and (ii) that remittitur or additur is necessary to avoid a 51 complete miscarriage of justice. In making such determination, the court 52 shall give primary weight to the remedial purpose of the law, and shall 53 not limit any award by using any characterizations of other damage 54 awards. In any such case, the court shall not be bound by any precedent 55 which utilized the concept of material deviation from what would be 56 reasonable compensation. This provision is substantive in nature, as S. 410 4 1 opposed to procedural, and shall be so applied in any employment 2 discrimination action under this article, regardless of forum. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 4 pending cases where a verdict has not yet been reached as of such effec- 5 tive date, as well as all claims filed on or after such effective date.